Illinois, session 104th, HB1775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Black 5Wall Street Program Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Black Wall Street Business District" means a designated 8area of economic and business growth created by an eligible 9municipality participating in the Program created under this 10Act for which Program loan funds are utilized. 11    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity. 13    "Program" means the Black Wall Street Program created 14under this Act.  15    Section 10. Black Wall Street Program. 16    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 17shall create and administer the Black Wall Street Program to 18provide loans and financial assistance to designated 19communities for the creation of Black Wall Street Business 20Districts as provided under this Act. 21    (b) Any municipality containing a population made up of at 22least 70% of African American citizens may apply, on an annual   HB1775- 2 -LRB104 09397 HLH 19456 b1basis, to the Department for a loan under the Program. To be 2eligible for the loan, an applicant municipality must pass an 3ordinance declaring its intent to create a Black Wall Street 4Business District in the municipality, and provide proof of 5such intent upon applying for the loan. No more than 10 6eligible municipalities may be chosen by the Department to 7receive a loan under the Program per year. 8    (c) Any eligible municipality chosen by the Department 9under subsection (b) shall, subject to appropriation, receive 10a $5,000,000 loan for the purpose of establishing a Black Wall 11Street Business District. Notwithstanding the requirements of 12subsection (b), for the first year of the Program, the 13following municipalities shall receive the loan amount 14specified under this subsection (c): (i) Harvey; (ii) Dolton; 15(iii) Calumet City; (iv) Ford Heights; (v) Chicago Heights; 16(vi) Peoria; (vii) East St Louis; and (viii) the City of 17Chicago to be used for the creation of a Black Wall Street 18Business District on the Westside of Chicago. 19    (d) Each municipality chosen by the Department to receive 20a loan under this Section shall, as prerequisite to reception 21of the loan, establish a Black Wall Street Investment Board. 22The Investment Board shall have the responsibility of 23administering the use of funds received by the municipality 24under this Section.  25    Section 15. Municipal investment programs.   HB1775- 3 -LRB104 09397 HLH 19456 b1    (a) Each municipality receiving a loan under the Program 2shall establish a municipal investment program by which loan 3funds are disbursed to qualified African American business 4entities and persons for the purpose of establishing Black 5Wall Street Business Districts. 6    (b) Those business entities and persons receiving loan 7funds under this Section may use such funds to invest in, 8issue, or sell bonds for the purpose of the construction of 9Black Wall Street Business Districts and all related matters. 10    (c) Business entities and persons seeking funds for the 11purposes of this Section shall apply to the Black Wall Street 12Investment Board of the municipality and be selected based 13upon terms and qualifications as set by the Investment Board.  14    Section 20. Contractor and engineer database. 15    (a) The Department shall compile and make available to the 16public on the Internet website of the Department a database of 17qualified African American contractors and engineers from 18which both public and private entities may seek services for 19their contractor and engineering needs. 20    (b) The employment of contractors and engineers listed on 21the database created under this Section shall conform to all 22applicable requirements of the Illinois Procurement Code, the 23Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 24Disabilities Act, and any other State or federal law.    HB1775- 4 -LRB104 09397 HLH 19456 b1    Section 25. Black Wall Street Investment Hub. 2    (a) The Department shall create and administer a Black 3Wall Street Investment Hub for the purposes of providing 4assistance to African American business entities and persons 5in establishing the Black Wall Street business district and 6related matters. 7    (b) The services provided by the Investment Hub shall be 8in addition to those provided under the Program, and shall 9include, but not be limited to, the following: 10        (1) providing microloans, subject to appropriation, to 11    African American business entities and persons for the 12    purpose of establishing businesses in Black Wall Street 13    Business Districts, including for construction costs and 14    business development; 15        (2) support in establishing business plans, 16    development plans, and construction plans for businesses 17    in Black Wall Street Business Districts; 18        (3) providing business-related training, including, 19    but not limited to, training on business development, 20    customer service, marketing, customer loyalty, and 21    advertising; and 22        (4) any other service that the Department may deem 23    relevant to the establishment of a business for the 24    purposes of this Act.  25    Section 30. Administrative rules. The Department shall   HB1775- 5 -LRB104 09397 HLH 19456 b1adopt all rules necessary to the administration of the Program 2and the implementation of the requirements of this Act. 3    Section 35. Black Wall Street Fund. The Black Wall Street 4Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. All 5moneys in the Fund shall be used, subject to appropriation, by 6the Department for the purposes of administering the Program 7and the Black Wall Street Investment Hub established under 8this Act. 9    Section 100. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 10Section 5.1030 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)12    Sec. 5.1030. The Black Wall Street Fund.